Arkansas, session 2025, HB1697.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-63-305(b)(1), concerning new or
additional positions at Arkansas State University-Jonesboro, is amended to
read as follows:
(1) Arkansas State University-Jonesboro 375 425

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 6-63-305(b)(14), concerning new or
additional positions at Northwest Arkansas Community College, is amended to
read as follows:
(14) Northwest Arkansas Community College 80 100
*TNL265*
03/05/2025 4:53:18 PM TNL265

HB1697

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 6-63-305(b)(25), concerning new or
additional positions at University of Arkansas at Fayetteville, is amended to
read as follows:
(25) University of Arkansas at Fayetteville 750 1,000

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 6-63-305(b)(33), concerning new or
additional positions at University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff, is amended to
read as follows:
(33) University of Arkansas at Pine Bluff 150 200

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(a)(066), concerning motor vehicle
restrictions and authorizations for state entities and institutions of higher
education, is amended to read as follows:
(066) Black River Technical College 14 20

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(a)(101), concerning motor vehicle
restrictions and authorizations for state entities and institutions of higher
education, is amended to read as follows:
(101) Northwest Arkansas Community College 22 30

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(a)(109), concerning motor vehicle
restrictions and authorizations for state entities and institutions of higher
education, is amended to read as follows:
(109) University of Arkansas Community College at Rich Mountain
16 20

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(a)(115), concerning motor vehicle
restrictions and authorizations for state entities and institutions of higher
education, is amended to read as follows:
(115) Southern Arkansas University - Magnolia 59 65

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 19-4-906(a)(137), concerning motor vehicle
restrictions and authorizations for state entities and institutions of higher
education, is amended to read as follows:
(137) University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences 110 120
03/05/2025 4:53:18 PM TNL265

HB1697

SECTION 10. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the authorization for
additional provisional positions at state-supported institutions of higher
education is necessary in advance of the upcoming fiscal year; that the
authorization of additional motor vehicles for certain state-supported
institutions of higher education is necessary in advance of the upcoming
fiscal year; that certain federal and foundation grants are disbursed prior
to the upcoming fiscal year, making it necessary to implement the changes in
this act before the start of the new fiscal year; and that this act is
necessary to maintain efficient operation of certain state-supported
institutions of higher education. Therefore, an emergency is declared to
exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace,
health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2025.






















03/05/2025 4:53:18 PM TNL265